Maryland, session 2026, SB0759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
SUBTITLE 13. DIGITAL ASSETS AND DIGITAL ASSET STAKING.
12–1301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BLOCKCHAIN” MEANS DATA THAT IS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0759*

SENATE BILL 759
(1) SHARED ACROSS A PEER–TO–PEER NETWORK TO CREATE A
LEDGER OF VERIFIED TRANSACTIONS AND OTHER INFORMATION, LINKED
TOGETHER USING CRYPTOGRAPHY TO MAINTAIN THE INTEGRITY OF THE LEDGER
AND TO EXECUTE OTHER FUNCTIONS; AND
(2) DISTRIBUTED AMONG NETWORK PARTICIPANTS IN AN
AUTOMATED FASHION TO CONCURRENTLY UPDATE NETWORK PARTICIPANTS ON
THE STATE OF THE LEDGER AND OTHER FUNCTIONS.
(C) “BLOCKCHAIN PROTOCOL” MEANS A DECENTRALIZED PROTOCOL THAT
IS DEPLOYED TO A BLOCKCHAIN.
(D) “DECENTRALIZED PROTOCOL” MEANS AUTONOMOUS COMPUTER
SOFTWARE EXECUTED WITHOUT HUMAN INTERVENTION ACCORDING TO RULES
ALTERED BY A PREDETERMINED MECHANISM TO FACILITATE THE TRANSFER OF
DATA TO BE BROADCAST TO NODES.
(E) “DIGITAL ASSET” MEANS A VIRTUAL CURRENCY INCLUDING
CRYPTOCURRENCY, STABLECOINS, FUNGIBLE TOKENS, NONFUNGIBLE TOKENS, AND
OTHER DIGITAL REPRESENTATIONS OF VALUE USED AS A MEDIUM OF EXCHANGE,
UNIT OF ACCOUNT, OR STORE OF VALUE.
(F) “HARDWARE WALLET” MEANS A PHYSICAL DEVICE, AND ITS
ASSOCIATED KEYS, THAT:
(1) IS NOT CONTINUOUSLY CONNECTED TO THE INTERNET; AND
(2) ALLOWS A PERSON TO SECURE, TRANSFER, AND RETAIN
INDEPENDENT CONTROL OVER A DIGITAL ASSET.
(G) (1) “NODE” MEANS SOFTWARE RUN ON A COMPUTER THAT:
(I) COMMUNICATES WITH OTHER DEVICES OR PARTICIPANTS
ON A BLOCKCHAIN TO MAINTAIN CONSENSUS AND INTEGRITY OF THE BLOCKCHAIN;
(II) CREATES AND VALIDATES DATA ON A BLOCKCHAIN; OR
(III) CONTAINS AND UPDATES A COPY OF A BLOCKCHAIN.
(2) “NODE” DOES NOT INCLUDE COMPUTER SOFTWARE THAT
EXERCISES DISCRETION OVER A TRANSACTION INITIATED BY THE END USER OF A
BLOCKCHAIN PROTOCOL.

SENATE BILL 759 3
(H) “SELF–HOSTED WALLET” MEANS A DIGITAL INTERFACE, AND ITS
ASSOCIATED KEYS, THAT ALLOWS A PERSON TO SECURE, TRANSFER, AND RETAIN
INDEPENDENT CONTROL OVER A DIGITAL ASSET.
(I) “STAKING” MEANS COMMITTING A DIGITAL ASSET TO A BLOCKCHAIN TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE BLOCKCHAIN’S OPERATIONS.
(J) (1) “STAKING AS A SERVICE” MEANS THE PROVISION OF TECHNICAL
OR CUSTODIAL STAKING SERVICES BY A SERVICE PROVIDER, INCLUDING THE
OPERATION OF A NODE AND THE INFRASTRUCTURE NECESSARY TO FACILITATE
PARTICIPATION IN A BLOCKCHAIN BY THE SERVICE PROVIDER ON BEHALF OF THE
PERSON THAT OWNS THE DIGITAL ASSET BEING STAKED.
(2) “STAKING AS A SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE PROVISION OF
SERVICES DESIGNED TO GENERATE INVESTMENT RETURNS OR OTHER INCOME ON
BEHALF OF THE PERSON THAT OWNS THE DIGITAL ASSET BEING STAKED OTHER
THAN REWARDS ISSUED BY A BLOCKCHAIN.
(K) “VALIDATION” MEANS THE PROCESS BY WHICH A BLOCKCHAIN
PROTOCOL, THROUGH ITS CONSENSUS MECHANISM, CONFIRMS THE AUTHENTICITY
AND ACCURACY OF TRANSACTIONS OR OTHER DATA ENTRIES THAT ARE THEN
RECORDED ON A BLOCKCHAIN.
(L) “VIRTUAL CURRENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–1201 OF THIS
TITLE.
12–1302.
(A) AN AGENCY OR OTHER INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE OR A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE MAY NOT PROHIBIT, RESTRICT, OR
OTHERWISE IMPAIR THE ABILITY OF A PERSON IN THE STATE TO:
(1) ACCEPT A DIGITAL ASSET AS A METHOD OF PAYMENT FOR A GOOD
OR SERVICE;
(2) TAKE CUSTODY OF A DIGITAL ASSET USING A SELF–HOSTED
WALLET OR HARDWARE WALLET;
(3) OPERATE A NODE FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONNECTING TO A
BLOCKCHAIN AND PARTICIPATING IN A BLOCKCHAIN;
(4) DEVELOP SOFTWARE TO DEPLOY ON A BLOCKCHAIN;

SENATE BILL 759
(5) TRANSFER DIGITAL ASSETS TO ANOTHER PERSON USING A
BLOCKCHAIN; OR
(6) PARTICIPATE IN STAKING ON A BLOCKCHAIN.
(B) SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION PREEMPTS ANY EXISTING
REGULATION, RULE, OR ORDINANCE THAT CONFLICTS WITH THIS SECTION.
12–1303.
AN OFFER TO PROVIDE OR THE PROVISION OF DIGITAL ASSET STAKING AS A
SERVICE DOES NOT CONSTITUTE THE OFFER OF OR THE SALE OF AN INVESTMENT
CONTRACT OR OTHER SECURITY UNDER THE MARYLAND SECURITIES ACT AND IS
NOT SUBJECT TO § 11–205 OR § 11–501 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS
ARTICLE.
12–1304.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO ABROGATE OR RESTRICT THE
AUTHORITY OF:
(1) THE COMMISSIONER TO REGULATE DIGITAL ASSETS UNDER THE
MARYLAND MONEY TRANSMISSION ACT; OR
(2) THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE OFFICE OF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO ENFORCE THE MARYLAND CONSUMER PROTECTION
ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that § 12–1303 of the Financial Institutions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act, shall be construed as a clarification of existing law.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.